Nebraska, session 109, LB1256.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1256 LB1256
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-829.39, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-829.39 For purposes of the Emergency Management Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Civil defense emergency means an emergency declared by the
President of the United States or Congress pursuant to applicable federal
law finding that an attack upon the United States has occurred or is
anticipated and that the national safety therefor requires the invocation
of the emergency authority provided for by federal law. Civil defense
emergency also means an enemy attack or other hostile action within the
State of Nebraska or a determination by the President of the United
States that any attack has been made upon or is anticipated within a
designated geographic area which includes all or a part of the State of
Nebraska. Any such emergency shall terminate in the manner provided by
federal law or by proclamation of the Governor or resolution of the
Legislature terminating such emergency;
(2) Disaster means any event or the imminent threat thereof causing
widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property
resulting from any natural or manmade cause;
(3) Emergency means any event or the imminent threat thereof causing
serious damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from any
natural or manmade cause which, in the determination of the Governor or
the principal executive officer of a local government, requires immediate
action to accomplish the purposes of the Emergency Management Act and to
effectively respond to the event or threat of the event;
(4) Emergency management means the preparation for and the carrying
out of all emergency functions, other than functions for which military
forces are primarily responsible, to mitigate, prevent, minimize, respond
to, and recover from injury and damage resulting from disasters,
emergencies, or civil defense emergencies. Emergency management functions
include, but need not be limited to, firefighting services, police
-2-

LB1256 LB1256
2026 2026
services, medical and health services, search and rescue services,
engineering services, communications and warning systems, radiological
preparedness, hazardous materials response, evacuation of persons from
stricken areas, emergency welfare services, emergency transportation
services, restoration of public utility services, snow and ice removal,
flood management, and other functions related to civilian protection,
together with all other activities necessary or incidental to the
preparation for and carrying out of the functions listed in this
subdivision;
(5) Emergency management worker includes any full-time or part-time
paid, volunteer, or auxiliary employee of this state or other states,
territories, or possessions of the federal government or any neighboring
country or of any political subdivision thereof, of the District of
Columbia, or of any agency or organization performing emergency
management services at any place in this state subject to the order or
control of or pursuant to a request of the state government or any
political subdivision thereof and also includes instructors and students
in emergency management educational programs approved by the Nebraska
Emergency Management Agency or otherwise under the provisions of the
Emergency Management Act;
(6) Hazard mitigation means measures which will eliminate or reduce
the potential for damage to an area or facility from the effects of a
future disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency;
(7) Local government means a county, village, or city of any class;
(8) Political subdivision means a city, village, county, school
district, public power district, natural resources district, and any
other unit of government below the state level, including any entity
created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public
Agency Act;
(9) Principal executive officer means the mayor in a city of any
class or the elected chairperson of the governing body of a village or
-3-

LB1256 LB1256
2026 2026
county;
(10) State emergency response team means an organization for
emergency management established in accordance with the provisions of
sections 81-829.52 to 81-829.54 by state authority to supplement city,
village, county, or interjurisdictional emergency management
organizations in a stricken area; and
(11) Technological hazard means a hazard emanating from the
manufacture, transportation, and use of such substances as radioactive
materials, chemicals, explosives, flammables, agricultural pesticides,
herbicides, disease agents, oil spills, and debris from space.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-829.39, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-